District of Columbia statutes.
7-733.01

Deposit of fees.

(a)

Beginning with fiscal year 2007, the Mayor shall ensure that all fees and fines received from enforcement and regulation of the activities described in § 7-731 shall be deposited in the Regulatory Enforcement Fund as required by § 7-731(c).

(b)

Beginning with fiscal year 2007, the Mayor shall ensure that all licensing fees, civil fines, and interest relating to the practice of health occupations in the District shall be deposited in the Health Occupations Regulations Fund as required by § 7-732 [repealed].

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4904a
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5052, 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5052 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle F of title V of Law 16-33: Section 5051 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle F of title V of the act may be cited as the Department of Health Functions Clarification Amendment Act of 2005.